Washington statutes.
RCW 15.88.180

Funding staff support—Rules—Costs of implementing RCW 15.88.073.

(1) The director may provide by rule for a method to fund staff support for all commodity boards or commissions in accordance with RCW 43.23.033 if a position is not directly funded by the legislature and costs related to the specific activity undertaken on behalf of an individual commodity board or commission. The commission shall provide funds to the department according to the rules adopted by the director.

(2) The costs incurred by the department associated with the implementation of RCW 15.88.073 shall be paid for by the commission.

[ 2003 c 396 s 44; 2002 c 313 s 76.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 396: See note following RCW 15.66.030.

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.